Colorado, session 2026A, SB103.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado law recognizes community schools as evidence-based,
democratic public-school models that integrate academics, family
engagement, health services, and community partnerships;
(b) Under current law, the community school model appears
primarily as a last-resort accountability intervention, becoming available
after schools have entered priority improvement or turnaround status;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(c) Due to systemic inequities, the needs of Black, Latino, and
low-income students are unmet far more often and far earlier than
accountability systems recognize;
(d) The state must be proactive in allowing schools and families to
adopt evidence-based, comprehensive interventions, like the community
school model, before crisis emerges, thereby strengthening public schools
and ensuring all students have access to high-quality schools; and
(e) School district contracting and metro-district land gifts have
enabled privatization that diverts public education dollars and governance
to private parties. These gaps must be addressed to preserve transparency,
oversight, and equity.
(2) This act establishes early pathways for schools to adopt proven
evidence-based, comprehensive interventions, like the community school
model, and supports equitable school success across Colorado.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 22-32.5-112 as
follows:
22-32.5-112. Achieving community commitment to equitable
school success policy - required - definition.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "ACCESS POLICY" OR "POLICY" MEANS A POLICY DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (a) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, EACH INSTITUTE CHARTER
SCHOOL, DISTRICT CHARTER SCHOOL, AND LOCAL BOARD OF EDUCATION, FOR
ITS SCHOOLS THAT ARE NOT DISTRICT CHARTER SCHOOLS, SHALL ADOPT AND
IMPLEMENT AN ACHIEVING COMMUNITY COMMITMENT TO EQUITABLE
SCHOOL SUCCESS POLICY, TO BE KNOWN AS AN ACCESS POLICY, THAT
DIRECTS RESOURCES AND SUPPORTS TO AT-RISK STUDENTS, AND SHALL POST
THE POLICY ON THE SCHOOL'S OR SCHOOL DISTRICT'S WEBSITE.
(b) THE POLICY MAY INCLUDE:
(I) PARTNERSHIPS WITH COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS TO INCREASE
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-103

ACCESS TO HEALTH CLINICS, LEGAL SERVICES, AND COLLEGE OPPORTUNITIES
FOR STUDENTS AND THE COMMUNITY;
(II) INTEGRATED STUDENT SUPPORT AND WRAPAROUND SERVICES
INFORMED BY THE ASSET AND NEEDS ASSESSMENT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
22-32.5-103 (1.5)(a), INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, INCREASING
COUNSELORS, CASEWORKERS, AND OTHER MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONALS;
(III) EXTENDED LEARNING TIME WITH AFTER-SCHOOL, TUTORING,
AND OTHER SUMMER PROGRAMS;
(IV) STRATEGIES TO SUPPORT TEACHER RETENTION AND PAY,
INCLUDING INCREASING PLANNING TIME AND OPPORTUNITIES TO
COLLABORATE MEANINGFULLY WITH COLLEAGUES AND FUNDING
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT ADVANCEMENT OPPORTUNITIES;
(V) FAMILY AND COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT STRATEGIES THAT
REFLECT CULTURAL AND LINGUISTIC DIVERSITY, INCLUDING BILINGUAL AND
DUAL-LANGUAGE SUPPORTS, TRANSLATORS, AND FAMILY LIAISONS; AND
(VI) THE AT-RISK MEASURE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 22-54-104.6.
(c) AN INSTITUTE CHARTER SCHOOL, DISTRICT CHARTER SCHOOL,
AND A SCHOOL OF A LOCAL BOARD OF EDUCATION THAT IS NOT A DISTRICT
CHARTER SCHOOL THAT IS PARTICIPATING IN A PERFORMANCE,
IMPROVEMENT, PRIORITY IMPROVEMENT, OR TURNAROUND PLAN PURSUANT
TO SECTION 22-11-210, WHICH PLAN DIRECTS RESOURCES AND SUPPORTS TO
AT-RISK STUDENTS, IS DEEMED TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION, AND SHALL POST THE PLAN ON THE
SCHOOL OR SCHOOL DISTRICT'S WEBSITE.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-103

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-103